Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB196.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title and section 1 of the act of July 15, 2004 (P.L.731, No.85), known as the Elderly Immunization Act, are amended to read:AN ACTProviding for immunization against the influenza virus and pneumococcal disease for elderly and high risk persons.Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Elderly and High Risk Immunization Act.Section 2. The definition of "eligible person" in section 2 of the act is amended to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall 12345678910111213141516171819 have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Eligible person." A person:(1) 65 years of age or older[.] for pneumococcal vaccination.(2) 50 years of age or older for influenza vaccination.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0196PN0146 - 2 - 123456789